Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XXXIX.] SERVICES TO ADULTS

Cross References

Inspections of state-licensed care facilities; public notice,
see §321-1.8.

[§321-491] Purpose. The purpose
of this part is to establish the nature and type of services to elders,
disabled, and aged who are qualified to receive social services according to
standards and conditions prescribed by the department of health. [L 2012, c 93,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next